Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-17,105
Use of regular reserve account.

The regular reserve account shall belong to the credit union and shall be used to meet losses on risk assets and to meet such other classes of losses as are approved by the director. The regular reserve account shall not be distributed except on liquidation of the credit union or in accordance with a plan approved by the director.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 105.